Hawaii statutes.
[§11-402] Filing of complaint.
(a) A person alleging violations of this part shall file a complaint with the
commission.

(b) A complaint initiated by the commission
shall be in writing and signed by the executive director.

(c) A complaint by a person other than the
executive director shall be in writing, signed by the person filing the
complaint, and notarized. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next